Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Manner of Preventing Crimes.

Sec. 12.60.010.
Resistance to commission of crime. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For present provisions, see AS 11.81.330 — AS 11.81.350.]

Sec. 12.60.020.
Manner of preventing crime.

Crimes may be prevented by the intervention of the peace officers

by requiring security to keep the peace;

by forming a police in cities, towns, villages, and settlements, and by requiring their attendance at exposed places;

by suppressing riots.

History.

(§ 9.02 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.60.030.
Justification of persons aiding officers in preventing crime. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For present provisions, see AS 11.81.380.]